Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-111 Voting. (a) Persons
eligible to vote at a credit union meeting shall be:

(1) A member for at least three months; provided,
that during the first twelve months of the existence of the credit union, this
requirement shall not apply; and

(2) In compliance with all other voting requirements
as provided by the bylaws.

(b) Each member shall have only one vote,
regardless of the number or type of shares of the credit union such member
owns. A credit union member other than a natural person may vote through an
agent designated for the purpose.

(c) No member shall be entitled to vote by
proxy.

(d) Notwithstanding anything in this section,
credit unions may, if the bylaws of the credit union so provide, conduct
elections by mail or allow voting by absentee ballot; provided that all ballots
shall be signed by the voting member and shall be valid only for the designated
meeting.

(e) The board of directors may establish a
minimum age, not greater than eighteen years of age, as a qualification of
eligibility to vote at meetings of the members or to hold office, or both. [L
1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next